Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2132.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF MONTICELLO; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of a new water treatment facility, including accompanying water utility infrastructure and associated improvements, are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after August 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2030. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rates under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, except that the applicant must be the governmental entity that owns or contracts for the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after August 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2030. new text end